Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1145.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part III of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 41COMPLIANCE REVIEW AND REPORTING PROGRAMSec.4101. Scope of chapter.4102. Definitions.4103. Establishment and purposes of program.4104. Administration of program.4105. Compliance review.4106. Noncompliance.§ 4101. Scope of chapter.12345678910111213141516171819 This chapter relates to compliance review and reporting involving certain facilities and sexual abuse or exploitation.§ 4102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child." An individual under 18 years of age."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Facility." A hospital, health care facility or other facility licensed or inspected by the department and providing medical care to children."Program." The C ompliance Review and Reporting Program established under section 4103 (relating to establishment and purposes of program)."Sexual abuse or exploitation." As defined under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6303(a) (relating to definitions).§ 4103. Establishment and purposes of program.The C ompliance Review and Reporting Program is establi shed in the department to:(1) Monitor the reporting of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation.(2) Promote the health and safety of children.(3) Facilitate the prosecution of persons willfully failing to report sexual abuse or exploitation.§ 4104. Administration of program.The department shall administer the program.§ 4105. Compliance review.(a) Review of records.--(1) Under the program, the department shall, during an inspection of a facility, conduct a compliance review 20260SB1145PN1396 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consisting of a review of all relevant health records that: (i) were created since the immediately prior inspection;(ii) pertain to the care of children at the facility; and(iii) have not been previously reviewed.(2) The purpose of the compliance review under subsection (a) is to determine whether the required reports of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation were made in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services).(b) Report made regarding suspected sexual abuse or exploitation.--(1) If a compliance review for a facility reveals that a report of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation was made in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63, the facility shall produce confirmation of the report in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. § 6305 (relating to electronic reporting).(2) With respect to a confirmation under paragraph (1), the department shall verify the existence and validity of the confirmation and whether the confirmation corresponds to the relevant patient encounter.(3) The Department of Human Services shall:(i) Cooperate with the department in the verification process under paragraph (2).(ii) Upon request, confirm whether a report exists that corresponds to the submitted confirmation under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6305, including the relevant incident, date and patient.(4) The Department of Human Services shall develop a 20260SB1145PN1396 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 secure protocol to facilitate timely confirmation of reports under this subsection for the sole purpose of enabling the department to comply with the provisions of this subsection.(5) Any disclosure of information under this subsection shall be limited to confirmation of reporting compliance under this subsection and may not include investigative or identifying details beyond the information that is necessary to complete the verification process.(c) Report not made regarding suspected sexual abuse or exploitation.--If a compliance review for a facility reveals that a report of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation was not made in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63, the department shall:(1) Make a report of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 or otherwise notify child protective services or a law enforcement agency of the suspected sexual abuse or exploitation.(2) Record the name of any mandated reporter who knew or reasonably should have known of the circumstances requiring the reporting of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation but who did not file a report of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation.(d) Posting of information.--The department shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website a report identifying the names of each facility identified in a compliance review that failed to file a required report of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63. The report shall not include the name or other personally identifying information of any mandated reporter or alleged victim of sexual abuse or exploitation.20260SB1145PN1396 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4106. Noncompliance. (a) Civil action and referral.--If a compliance review of a facility under this chapter reveals that a required report of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation was not made in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services):(1) The parent or guardian of the alleged victim may institute an appropriate civil action for damages against the facility.(2) The department shall refer the name of any mandated reporter and facility in violation of 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 to the following for investigation or prosecution as provided by law:(i) The Pennsylvania State Police.(ii) The appropriate medical or professional licensing board.(iii) The district attorney of the county in which the mandated reported or facility is located.(iv) As appropriate, the Office of Attorney General.(b) Civil penalty.--(1) If, during a compliance review of a facility under this chapter, the facility willfully fails to provide the necessary records to the department or willfully conceals, alters or otherwise obstructs access to the necessary records that are relevant to the determination by the department of the facility's compliance with the provisions of this chapter, the facility shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $2,500 for each day that the records are not provided or are concealed or altered or that access is obstructed.20260SB1145PN1396 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Civil penalties collected under paragraph (1) shall be deposited into the Safe Harbor for Sexually Exploited Children Fund.(c) Reimbursements.--If three or more separate compliance reviews of a facility under this chapter reveal that the facility failed to file a required report of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63, the Department of Human Services shall withhold reimbursement for all or part of the activities of the facility that fall within the scope of State-funded health care services until compliance with the mandatory reporting requirements is demonstrated.(d) Inspector.--If the inspector from the department who is conducting the compliance review under this chapter willfully does not comply with section 4105(c)(1) (relating to compliance review), the inspector shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 2. This act shall apply to inspections of facilities that are commenced on and after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20260SB1145PN1396 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617181920